Massachusetts, session 194th, H2278.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 90 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after section 20A½ the
following section:-
Section 20A¾. Notwithstanding sections 20A or 20A½ or any other general or special
law to the contrary, the schedule of additional fines and interest thereof authorized pursuant to
said sections 20A and 20A½ accrued either by: (i) payment later than 21 days after issuance of
the fine but before the parking clerk reports said fine to the registrar pursuant to said sections
20A and 20A½; or (ii) issuance of the registrar after the parking clerk reports said fine pursuant
to said sections 20A and 20A½, shall not exceed the original fine of said violation.
of 1